spellchecker/hunspell/bak/bash (1).aff
FLAG num
SFX 210 к гоңдағылабыҙмылыр . +PxSg2+Der/дағы+Loc+Pred1Pl+Q+Indf
SFX 210 к гоңдағылабыҙсы . +PxSg2+Der/дағы+Loc+Pred1Pl+Clt/сы
SFX 210 к гоңдағылаһығыҙ . +PxSg2+Der/дағы+Loc+Pred2Pl
SFX 210 к гоңдағылаһығыҙмы . +PxSg2+Der/дағы+Loc+Pred2Pl+Q
SFX 210 к гоңдағылаһығыҙҙыр . +PxSg2+Der/дағы+Loc+Pred2Pl+Indf
SFX 210 к гоңдағылаһығыҙмылыр . +PxSg2+Der/дағы+Loc+Pred2Pl+Q+Indf
SFX 210 к гоңдағылаһығыҙсы . +PxSg2+Der/дағы+Loc+Pred2Pl+Clt/сы
SFX 210 к гондағыламын . +PxSg3+Der/дағы+Loc+Pred1Sg
SFX 210 к гондағыламынмы . +PxSg3+Der/дағы+Loc+Pred1Sg+Q
SFX 210 к гондағыламындыр . +PxSg3+Der/дағы+Loc+Pred1Sg+Indf
SFX 210 к гондағыламынмылыр . +PxSg3+Der/дағы+Loc+Pred1Sg+Q+Indf
SFX 210 к гондағыламынсы . +PxSg3+Der/дағы+Loc+Pred1Sg+Clt/сы
SFX 210 к гондағылаһың . +PxSg3+Der/дағы+Loc+Pred2Sg
SFX 210 к гондағылаһыңмы . +PxSg3+Der/дағы+Loc+Pred2Sg+Q
SFX 210 к гондағылаһыңдыр . +PxSg3+Der/дағы+Loc+Pred2Sg+Indf
SFX 210 к гондағылаһыңмылыр . +PxSg3+Der/дағы+Loc+Pred2Sg+Q+Indf
SFX 210 к гондағылаһыңсы . +PxSg3+Der/дағы+Loc+Pred2Sg+Clt/сы
SFX 210 к гондағылабыҙ . +PxSg3+Der/дағы+Loc+Pred1Pl
SFX 210 к гондағылабыҙмы . +PxSg3+Der/дағы+Loc+Pred1Pl+Q
SFX 210 к гондағылабыҙҙыр . +PxSg3+Der/дағы+Loc+Pred1Pl+Indf
SFX 210 к гондағылабыҙмылыр . +PxSg3+Der/дағы+Loc+Pred1Pl+Q+Indf
SFX 210 к гондағылабыҙсы . +PxSg3+Der/дағы+Loc+Pred1Pl+Clt/сы
SFX 210 к гондағылаһығыҙ . +PxSg3+Der/дағы+Loc+Pred2Pl
SFX 210 к гондағылаһығыҙмы . +PxSg3+Der/дағы+Loc+Pred2Pl+Q
SFX 210 к гондағылаһығыҙҙыр . +PxSg3+Der/дағы+Loc+Pred2Pl+Indf
SFX 210 к гондағылаһығыҙмылыр . +PxSg3+Der/дағы+Loc+Pred2Pl+Q+Indf
SFX 210 к гондағылаһығыҙсы . +PxSg3+Der/дағы+Loc+Pred2Pl+Clt/сы
SFX 210 к гобоҙҙағыламын . +PxPl1+Der/дағы+Loc+Pred1Sg
SFX 210 к гобоҙҙағыламынмы . +PxPl1+Der/дағы+Loc+Pred1Sg+Q
SFX 210 к гобоҙҙағыламындыр . +PxPl1+Der/дағы+Loc+Pred1Sg+Indf
SFX 210 к гобоҙҙағыламынмылыр . +PxPl1+Der/дағы+Loc+Pred1Sg+Q+Indf
SFX 210 к гобоҙҙағыламынсы . +PxPl1+Der/дағы+Loc+Pred1Sg+Clt/сы
SFX 210 к гобоҙҙағылаһың . +PxPl1+Der/дағы+Loc+Pred2Sg
SFX 210 к гобоҙҙағылаһыңмы . +PxPl1+Der/дағы+Loc+Pred2Sg+Q
SFX 210 к гобоҙҙағылаһыңдыр . +PxPl1+Der/дағы+Loc+Pred2Sg+Indf
SFX 210 к гобоҙҙағылаһыңмылыр . +PxPl1+Der/дағы+Loc+Pred2Sg+Q+Indf
SFX 210 к гобоҙҙағылаһыңсы . +PxPl1+Der/дағы+Loc+Pred2Sg+Clt/сы
SFX 210 к гобоҙҙағылабыҙ . +PxPl1+Der/дағы+Loc+Pred1Pl
SFX 210 к гобоҙҙағылабыҙмы . +PxPl1+Der/дағы+Loc+Pred1Pl+Q
SFX 210 к гобоҙҙағылабыҙҙыр . +PxPl1+Der/дағы+Loc+Pred1Pl+Indf
SFX 210 к гобоҙҙағылабыҙмылыр . +PxPl1+Der/дағы+Loc+Pred1Pl+Q+Indf
SFX 210 к гобоҙҙағылабыҙсы . +PxPl1+Der/дағы+Loc+Pred1Pl+Clt/сы
SFX 210 к гобоҙҙағылаһығыҙ . +PxPl1+Der/дағы+Loc+Pred2Pl
SFX 210 к гобоҙҙағылаһығыҙмы . +PxPl1+Der/дағы+Loc+Pred2Pl+Q
SFX 210 к гобоҙҙағылаһығыҙҙыр . +PxPl1+Der/дағы+Loc+Pred2Pl+Indf
SFX 210 к гобоҙҙағылаһығыҙмылыр . +PxPl1+Der/дағы+Loc+Pred2Pl+Q+Indf
SFX 210 к гобоҙҙағылаһығыҙсы . +PxPl1+Der/дағы+Loc+Pred2Pl+Clt/сы
SFX 210 к гоғоҙҙағыламын . +PxPl2+Der/дағы+Loc+Pred1Sg
SFX 210 к гоғоҙҙағыламынмы . +PxPl2+Der/дағы+Loc+Pred1Sg+Q
SFX 210 к гоғоҙҙағыламындыр . +PxPl2+Der/дағы+Loc+Pred1Sg+Indf
SFX 210 к гоғоҙҙағыламынмылыр . +PxPl2+Der/дағы+Loc+Pred1Sg+Q+Indf
SFX 210 к гоғоҙҙағыламынсы . +PxPl2+Der/дағы+Loc+Pred1Sg+Clt/сы
SFX 210 к гоғоҙҙағылаһың . +PxPl2+Der/дағы+Loc+Pred2Sg
SFX 210 к гоғоҙҙағылаһыңмы . +PxPl2+Der/дағы+Loc+Pred2Sg+Q
SFX 210 к гоғоҙҙағылаһыңдыр . +PxPl2+Der/дағы+Loc+Pred2Sg+Indf
SFX 210 к гоғоҙҙағылаһыңмылыр . +PxPl2+Der/дағы+Loc+Pred2Sg+Q+Indf
SFX 210 к гоғоҙҙағылаһыңсы . +PxPl2+Der/дағы+Loc+Pred2Sg+Clt/сы
SFX 210 к гоғоҙҙағылабыҙ . +PxPl2+Der/дағы+Loc+Pred1Pl
SFX 210 к гоғоҙҙағылабыҙмы . +PxPl2+Der/дағы+Loc+Pred1Pl+Q
SFX 210 к гоғоҙҙағылабыҙҙыр . +PxPl2+Der/дағы+Loc+Pred1Pl+Indf
SFX 210 к гоғоҙҙағылабыҙмылыр . +PxPl2+Der/дағы+Loc+Pred1Pl+Q+Indf
SFX 210 к гоғоҙҙағылабыҙсы . +PxPl2+Der/дағы+Loc+Pred1Pl+Clt/сы
SFX 210 к гоғоҙҙағылаһығыҙ . +PxPl2+Der/дағы+Loc+Pred2Pl
SFX 210 к гоғоҙҙағылаһығыҙмы . +PxPl2+Der/дағы+Loc+Pred2Pl+Q
SFX 210 к гоғоҙҙағылаһығыҙҙыр . +PxPl2+Der/дағы+Loc+Pred2Pl+Indf
SFX 210 к гоғоҙҙағылаһығыҙмылыр . +PxPl2+Der/дағы+Loc+Pred2Pl+Q+Indf
SFX 210 к гоғоҙҙағылаһығыҙсы . +PxPl2+Der/дағы+Loc+Pred2Pl+Clt/сы
# generated grammar completion rows: 2200
